Hawaii, session 2026, HB2055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the integrity of Hawaii's government and democratic process rests upon the public's confidence in institutions that provide robust and independent oversight of the political landscape.  Government agencies such as the campaign spending commission, state ethics commission, auditor's office, office of the ombudsman, and legislative reference bureau are vital watchdogs, each charged with independent oversight to ensure that state operations remain free from impropriety and are conducted with transparency and accountability. The legislature further finds that while the campaign spending commission is administratively placed within the executive branch, like its legislative-branch counterparts it shares the common public purpose of protecting against corruption, holding officials and state employees accountable, and maintaining the public's trust.  To this end, it is critical that the campaign spending commission have the necessary resources to effectively fulfill its mission.  However, unlike its legislative-branch counterparts, the campaign spending commission's compensation structure is disparate.  To recruit and retain experienced staff of the campaign spending commission, it is in the public's interest to provide a similar compensation structure that acknowledges the equally critical responsibilities, functions, independence, and professional demands to ensure that public trust and the integrity of state government is safeguarded uniformly and consistently. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to increase the salaries of the campaign spending commission's staff to align with the compensation levels of similar legislative-branch agencies having compliance and enforcement duties, thereby securing the highest standards of public oversight for the people of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Section 11-314, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§11-314  Duties of the commission.  The duties of the commission under this part are to: (1)  Develop and adopt forms required by this part; (2)  Adopt and publish a manual for all candidates, candidate committees, and noncandidate committees, describing the requirements of this part, including uniform and simple methods of recordkeeping; (3)  Preserve all reports required by this part for at least ten years from the date of receipt by the commission; (4)  Permit the inspection, copying, or duplication of any report required by this part pursuant to rules adopted by the commission under chapter 91; provided that this paragraph shall not apply to the sale or use of information under section 11-344; (5)  Ascertain whether any person has failed to file a report required by this part or has filed a substantially defective or deficient report.  The commission shall notify the person by first class mail that a fine may be assessed for the failure to file or the filing of a substantially defective or deficient report, and the defective or deficient report shall be corrected and explained.  All fines collected under this section as authorized by sections 11-340 and 11‑410 shall be deposited in the general fund of the State; (6)  Hold public hearings; (7)  Investigate and hold hearings for receiving evidence of any violations pursuant to subpart I of this part; (8)  Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91; (9)  Request the initiation of prosecution for the violation of this part pursuant to section 11-411; (10)  Administer and monitor the distribution of public funds under this part; (11)  Suggest accounting methods for candidates, candidate committees, or noncandidate committees in connection with reports and records required by this part; (12)  Employ or contract with, without regard to chapters 76, 78, and 89, persons it finds necessary for the performance of its functions, including a full-time executive director[, and to fix their compensation]; provided that the commission shall have the authority, at its discretion, to dismiss persons employed by or contracted with the commission[;].  The salary of the executive director shall be the same as the salary of the director of health.  The executive director shall appoint an associate director and other officers and employees as may be necessary to carry out the functions of the commission.  The salary of the associate director shall be not more than eighty-seven per cent of the salary of the executive director.  The executive director shall fix the compensation of the employees within the amounts appropriated by the legislature.  The executive director, associate director, and commission's full-time staff shall be entitled to participate in any employee benefit program or privilege; (13)  Conduct random audits and field investigations, as necessary; and (14)  File for injunctive relief when indicated." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $138,679 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for salary increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the executive director, associate director, and employees of the campaign spending commission excluded from collective bargaining. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the campaign spending commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request